Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.090

Exemptions.

The registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(1) An authorized representative of the United States government, the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county, township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal or political corporation or subdivision of this state;

(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of their office;

(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance, or development work incidental to their own business;

(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing, abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an owner or lessee;

(5) The sale of any finished products, materials, or articles of merchandise that are not fabricated into and do not become a part of a structure under the common law of fixtures;

(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the legal jurisdiction of the federal government;

(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of, the work of the contractor;

(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and materials and all other items is less than five hundred dollars, such work or operations being considered as of a casual, minor, or inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises or puts out any sign or card or other device which might indicate to the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he or she is qualified to engage in the business of contractor;

(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying, agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by a registered contractor;

(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a registered contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the owner of the protections of this chapter against registered and unregistered contractors. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who performs the activities of a contractor for the purpose of leasing or selling improved property he or she has owned for less than twelve months;

(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not but this exemption shall not apply to any person who performs the activities of a contractor on his or her own property for the purpose of selling, demolishing, or leasing the property;

(13) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work in or upon his or her own properties, or who uses his or her own employees to do such work;

(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician certified under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber certified under the laws of the state of Washington or licensed by a political subdivision of the state of Washington while operating within the boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in this subsection is applicable only when the person certified is operating within the scope of his or her certification;

(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as an employee of a registered contractor with wages as his or her sole compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation;

(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;

(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively registered contractors. This exemption only applies to the installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes that were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer.

[ 2020 c 153 s 22; 2013 c 23 s 13; 2007 c 436 s 6; 2003 c 399 s 401; 2001 c 159 s 7; 1997 c 314 s 8; 1987 c 313 s 1; 1983 c 4 s 1; 1980 c 68 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 25 s 2. Prior: 1973 1st ex.s. c 161 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 153 s 6; 1967 c 126 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 170 s 50; 1963 c 77 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 153 ss 21, 22, and 28: See note following RCW 18.27.060.

Part headings not law—2003 c 399: See note following RCW 19.28.006.